it: foro posteriore del bocchino in ottone: Aperto; Standard; Stretto; Molto aperto; Altro
fr: Perce arrière de l’embouchure en laiton: Ouverte; Standard; Étroite; Très ouverte; Autre
pl: Backbore ustnika do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Otwarty; Standardowy; Wąski; Bardzo otwarty; Inny
zh-TW: 銅管吹嘴後膛: 開闊; 標準; 緊密; 非常開闊; 其他
nb: Munnstykke i messing bakboring: Åpen; Standard; Trang; Veldig åpen; Annet
lt-LT: Varinio pučiamojo instrumento kandiklio backbore: Atviras; Standartinis; Siauras; Labai atviras; Kita
el: Πίσω διάμετρος του χάλκινου επιστομίου: Ανοιχτός; Τυπικός; Στενός; Πολύ ανοιχτός; Άλλο
sv: Backbore-munstycke: Öppen; Standard; Trång; Mycket öppen; Övrigt
ja: 真鍮製マウスピースバックボア: オープン; スタンダード; タイト; ベリーオープン; その他
bg-BG: Заден канал на мундщука за месингови музикални инструменти: Отворен; Стандартен; Тесен; Много отворен; Друго
pt-BR: Abertura posterior do bocal para instrumentos de sopro de metal: Aberto; Padrão; Estreito; Muito aberto; Outros
es: Perforación posterior de la boquilla para instrumentos de metal: Abierto; Estándar; Estrecho; Muy abierto; Otro
ko: 황동 마우스피스 백보어: 오픈; 표준; 타이트; 베리 오픈; 기타
pt-PT: Bocal backbore de latão: Aberto; Padrão; Apertado; Muito aberto; Outro
hu: Rézfúvós fúvóka hátsó furata: Nyitott; Normál; Szűk; Nagyon nyitott; Egyéb
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı ağızlığı arka delik profili: Açık; Standart; Dar; Çok açık; Diğer
en: Brass mouthpiece backbore: Open; Standard; Tight; Very open; Other
de: Rückbohrung des Messingmundstücks: Offen; Standard; Eng; Sehr offen; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Notranjost ustnika za trobila: Odprto; Standardno; Ozko; Zelo odprto; Drugo
da: Bagboring på messingmundstykke: Åben; Standard; Snæver; Meget åben; Andet
sk-SK: Mosadzný zadný otvor náustku: Otvorená; Štandardná; Úzka; Veľmi otvorená; Iné
th: ลักษณะภายในของปากเป่าทองเหลือง: กว้าง; มาตรฐาน; แคบ; กว้างมาก; อื่นๆ
vi: Ống ngậm bằng đồng thau: Mở; Tiêu chuẩn; Hẹp; Rất mở; Khác
fi: Messinkinen suukappaleen takaporaus: Avoin; Vakio; Kireä; Erittäin avoin; Muu
cs: Zadní vývrt (backbore) náustku žesťových nástrojů: Otevřená; Standardní; Úzká; Velmi otevřená; Jiné
hr-HR: Stražnji otvor usnika od mesinga: Otvoreno; Standardno; Usko; Vrlo otvoreno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Muștiuc din alamă: Deschis; Standard; Strâns; Foarte deschis; Altele
zh-CN: 号嘴背膛: 开阔; 标准; 紧凑; 非常开阔; 其他
nl: Koperblaasmondstuk boring: Open; Standaard; Nauw; Zeer open; Overig
ru: Профиль задней канавки мундштука духового инструмента: Открытый; Стандартный; Узкий; Очень открытый; Другой